Nevada, session 83, AB570.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Prison
Medical Care budget account for the replacement of medical and
dental equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $324,664
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $39,939
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the
Director budget account for the replacement of vehicles the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $5,154,386
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $43,446
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the
Director budget account for the replacement of equipment related to
information technology networks and systems the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $161,526
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $133,153
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the Director
budget account the sum of $225,750 for the replacement of
refrigerator trucks.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the Director
budget account the sum of $123,308 for the replacement of office
chairs and furniture for an executive office.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the Director
budget account the sum of $2,861,657 for the replacement of
passenger buses and purchase of transport vans.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the Director
budget account the sum of $103,347 for the replacement of
computer hardware and associated software.
Sec. 9. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the Director
budget account the sum of $1,313,733 for equipment and training
for correctional officers.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 10. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Correctional
Programs budget account the sum of $71,604 for the replacement of
office chairs.
Sec. 11. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
sections 5 to 10, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 12. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Office of the
Director budget account the sum of $341,630 for the replacement of
hardware, software and equipment for information technology
servers.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 13. 1. This section and sections 1 to 11, inclusive, of
this act become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Section 12 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)